test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngaedarasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахар”ӈахаюдамда, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахар”ӈахаюдамди’, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарахар”ӈахаюдамдо’, ӈэдарахарӈахаюдамдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдарахаръядамдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыв, ӈэдарасетыв]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыр, ӈэдарасетыр]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыда, ӈэдарасетыда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыми’, ӈэдарасетыми’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыри’, ӈэдарасетыри’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыди’, ӈэдарасетыди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыва”, ӈэдарасетыва”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыра”, ӈэдарасетыра”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтыдо’, ӈэдарасетыдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюн, ӈэдарасетыхыюн]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюд, ӈэдарасетыхыюд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюда, ӈэдарасетыхыюда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюни’, ӈэдарасетыхыюни’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюди’, ӈэдарасетыхыюди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюди’, ӈэдарасетыхыюди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюна”, ӈэдарасетыхыюна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюда”, ӈэдарасетыхыюда”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтыхыюдо’, ӈэдарасетыхыюдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтын, ӈэдарасетын]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыд, ӈэдарасетыд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыда, ӈэдарасетыда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыни’, ӈэдарасетыни’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыди’, ӈэдарасетыди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыди’, ӈэдарасетыди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтына”, ӈэдарасетына”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыда”, ӈэдарасетыда”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтыдо’, ӈэдарасетыдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэв, ӈэдарасетавэв]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэр, ӈэдарасетавэр]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэда, ӈэдарасетавэда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэми’, ӈэдарасетавэми’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэри’, ӈэдарасетавэри’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэди’, ӈэдарасетавэди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэва”, ӈэдарасетавэва”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэра”, ӈэдарасетавэра”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [ӈэдарасьтавэдо’, ӈэдарасетавэдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюн, ӈэдарасетавэхэюн]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюд, ӈэдарасетавэхэюд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюда, ӈэдарасетавэхэюда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюни’, ӈэдарасетавэхэюни’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюди’, ӈэдарасетавэхэюди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюди’, ӈэдарасетавэхэюди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюна”, ӈэдарасетавэхэюна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюда”, ӈэдарасетавэхэюда”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [ӈэдарасьтавэхэюдо’, ӈэдарасетавэхэюдо’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавын, ӈэдарасетавын]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыд, ӈэдарасетавыд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыда, ӈэдарасетавыда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыни’, ӈэдарасетавыни’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыди’, ӈэдарасетавыди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыди’, ӈэдарасетавыди’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавына”, ӈэдарасетавына”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыда”, ӈэдарасетавыда”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [ӈэдарасьтавыдо’, ӈэдарасетавыдо’]
